Wisconsin, session 2025, SB33.
do enact as follows:SB33,11Section 1. 942.09 (1) (e) of the statutes is created to read:SB33,2,62942.09 (1) (e) “Synthetic intimate representation” means a representation 3generated using technological means that uses an identifiable person’s face, 4likeness, or other distinguishing characteristic to depict an intimate representation 5of that person, regardless of whether the representation includes components that 6are artificial, legally generated, or generally accessible.SB33,27Section 2. 942.09 (2) (am) 4. of the statutes is created to read:SB33,2,108942.09 (2) (am) 4. Posts, publishes, distributes, or exhibits a synthetic 9intimate representation of an identifiable person with intent to coerce, harass, or 10intimidate that person.SB33,311Section 3. 942.09 (3m) (a) 3. of the statutes is created to read:SB33,2,1412942.09 (3m) (a) 3. Makes a reproduction of a private representation, if the 13person depicted in the reproduction did not consent to the making of the 14reproduction.SB33,2,1515